Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.070

Employees' retirement fund created—Composition.

A fund is hereby created and established in all cities of the first class as under this chapter provided to be known as the "employees' retirement fund" and shall consist of all the moneys paid into it in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, whether such moneys shall take the form of cash, securities, or other assets.

[ 1939 c 207 s 8; RRS s 9592-108.]